Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Federal Offices.

§ 24.2-202.
Electors for President and Vice President.

The qualified voters of the Commonwealth shall choose the Commonwealth’s electors for President and Vice President of the United States at the general election in November 1996, and every fourth year thereafter. Each voter shall vote for a number of electors which equals the whole number of senators and representatives to which the Commonwealth at that time is entitled in the Congress of the United States.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-7; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-8; 1993, c. 641.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. United States, § 3.

§ 24.2-203.
Convening of electors; filling vacancies; how electors required to vote.

The electors shall convene at the capitol building in the capital city of the Commonwealth at 12:00 noon on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December following their election. Those electors present shall immediately fill, by ballot and by a plurality of votes, any vacancy due to death, failure or inability to attend, refusal to act, or other cause. When all electors are present, or the vacancies have been filled, they shall proceed to perform the duties required of such electors by the Constitution and laws of the United States.

Electors selected by the state convention of any political party as defined in §

24.2-101

shall be required to vote for the nominees of the national convention to which the state convention elects delegates. Electors named in any petition of qualified voters as provided in §

24.2-543

shall be required to vote for the persons named for President and for Vice President in the petition.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-8, 24-9, 24-290.6; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-9, 24.1-162; 1993, c. 641; 2001, c. 630.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 630 substituted “required to vote” for “expected to vote” in two places in the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Election Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 575 (2001).

§ 24.2-204.
Election of electors and meeting when Congress prescribes a different day.

If Congress establishes a different day for choosing electors, or appoints a different day for their meeting to give their votes, then the election shall be held and the meeting of the electors take place on those days.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-8, 24-9; 1962, c. 536; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-9; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-205.
Pay of electors.

Each elector shall receive the sum of fifty dollars per day while actually engaged in the discharge of his official duties and the same mileage as is allowed to members of the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-10; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-10; 1976, c. 616; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-206.
Election and term of United States Senators.

The qualified voters of the Commonwealth shall elect its members of the United States Senate at the general election held in November next preceding the expiration of each member’s respective term of office, for terms of six years to begin on the January 3 following their election.

History.

Code 1950, §

24-1

; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-2; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-207.
Filling vacancies in Senate.

When any vacancy occurs in the representation of the Commonwealth of Virginia in the United States Senate, the Governor shall issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
The election shall be held on the next succeeding November general election date or, if the vacancy occurs within 120 days prior to that date, on the second succeeding November general election date.
The Governor may make a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy until the qualified voters fill the same by election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-2; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-3; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-208.
Election and term of members of House of Representatives.

The qualified voters of each congressional district shall elect one member of the United States House of Representatives at the general election in November 1994, and every second year thereafter, for the term of two years to begin on the January 3 following his election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-5; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-6; 1993, c. 641.

§ 24.2-209.
Filling vacancies in House of Representatives.

When any vacancy occurs in the representation of the Commonwealth of Virginia in the House of Representatives, or when a representative-elect dies or resigns, the Governor shall issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy. Upon receipt of written notification by a representative or representative-elect of his resignation as of a stated date, the Governor may immediately issue a writ to call the election. The representative’s or representative-elect’s resignation shall not be revocable after the date stated by him for his resignation or after the forty-fifth day before the date set for the special election.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-6; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-7; 1983, c. 461; 1993, c. 641; 2003, c. 1015; 2010, cc. 449, 645.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted the last sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and substituted “forty-fifth day” for “thirtieth day.”